Washington statutes.
RCW 19.330.070

Attachment of articles or products.

(1) In a case in which the court is unable to obtain personal jurisdiction over a person subject to RCW 19.330.020, the court may proceed in rem against any articles or products subject to RCW 19.330.020 sold or offered for sale in this state in which the person alleged to have violated RCW 19.330.020 holds title. Except as provided in RCW 19.330.040 and subsection[s] (2) through (4) of this section, all such articles or products are subject to attachment at or after the time of filing a complaint, regardless of the availability or amount of any monetary judgment.

(2) At least ninety days prior to the enforcement of an attachment order against articles or products pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the court shall notify any person in possession of the articles or products of the pending attachment order. Prior to the expiration of the ninety-day period, any person for whom the articles or products were manufactured, or to whom the articles or products have been or are to be supplied, pursuant to an existing contract or purchase order, may:

(a) Establish that the person has satisfied one or more of the affirmative defenses set forth in RCW 19.330.080(1) with respect to the manufacturer alleged to have violated RCW 19.330.020, in which case the attachment order must be dissolved only with respect to those articles or products that were manufactured for such a person, or have been or are to be supplied to such a person, pursuant to an existing contract or purchase order; or

(b) Post a bond with the court equal to the retail price of the allegedly stolen or misappropriated information technology or twenty-five thousand dollars, whichever is less, in which case the court shall stay enforcement of the attachment order against the articles or products and shall proceed on the basis of its jurisdiction over the bond. The person posting the bond shall recover the full amount of such bond, plus interest, after the issuance of a final judgment.

(3) In the event the person posting the bond pursuant to subsection (2)(b) of this section is entitled to claim an affirmative defense in RCW 19.330.080, and that person establishes with the court that the person is entitled to any affirmative defense, the court shall award costs and reasonable attorneys' fees to the person posting the bond and against the plaintiff in the event the plaintiff proceeds with an action pursuant to RCW 19.330.060(2) against the person posting the bond.

(4) In the event that the court does not provide notification as described in subsection (2) of this section, the court, upon motion of any third party, shall stay the enforcement of the attachment order for ninety days as to articles or products manufactured for the third party, or that have been or are to be supplied to the third party, pursuant to an existing contract or purchase order, during which ninety-day period the third party may avail itself of the options set forth in subsection (2)(a) and (b) of this section.

[ 2011 c 98 s 7.]